District of Columbia statutes.
38-451

Repealed

Office of Public Education Facilities Modernization; establishment.

Repealed.

June 12, 2007, D.C. Law 17-9, § 702, 54 DCR 4102
Sept. 18, 2007, D.C. Law 17-20, § 4043(a), 54 DCR 7052
Aug. 16, 2008, D.C. Law 17-219, § 4018, 55 DCR 7598
Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21, § 1032(b), 58 DCR 6226
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 4043(a) of Fiscal Year 2008 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-74, July 25, 2007, 54 DCR 7549).
For temporary (90 day) amendment, see § 4018 of Fiscal Year 2009 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2008 (D.C. Act 17-468, July 28, 2008, 55 DCR 8746).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 1012(b) of Fiscal Year 2012 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2011 (D.C. Act 19-93, June 29, 2011, 58 DCR 5599).
Short title: Section 4017 of D.C. Law 17-219 provided that subtitle I of title IV of the act may be cited as the “Office of Public Education Facilities Modernization Personnel Amendment Act of 2008”.